Utah statutes.
4-37-305.   Fishing license not required to fish at fee fishing facilities
-- Transportation of dead fish.
(1)  A fishing license is not required to take fish from fee fishing
facilities.
(2)  To transport dead fish from fee fishing facilities the fish must be
accompanied by the seller's receipt containing the following information:
(a)  species and number of fish;
(b)  date caught;
(c)  certificate of registration number of the fee fishing facility; and
(d)  name, address, and telephone number of the seller.
